Arkansas, session 2025, SB558.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF ARKANSAS:

SECTION 1. Arkansas Code § 26-51-804, concerning corporation income
tax returns, is amended to add an additional subsection to read as follows:
(f)(1) A taxpayer filing a return under this section that would be
required to file the taxpayer's return electronically with the Internal
Revenue Service under 26 C.F.R. § 301.6011-5, as it existed on February 23,
2023, shall file the return required under this section electronically.
(2) A taxpayer filing a return under this section that is a
member of an affiliated group in a federal consolidated return in which the
federal parent corporation would be required to file electronically with the
Internal Revenue Service under 26 C.F.R. § 301.6011-5, as it existed on
February 23, 2023, shall file the taxpayer's state return electronically
under this section.
(3) The Secretary of the Department of Finance and
Administration may waive the electronic filing requirement under subdivision
(f)(1) or subdivision (f)(2) of this section for a taxpayer only if the
secretary determines that filing the return electronically would cause an
undue hardship on the taxpayer.
*JLL092*
03/21/2025 4:34:11 PM JLL092

SB558

SECTION 2. Arkansas Code § 26-51-805, concerning consolidated
corporate income tax returns, is amended to add an additional subsection to
read as follows:
(h)(1) A taxpayer filing a return under this section that would be
required to file the taxpayer's return electronically with the Internal
Revenue Service under 26 C.F.R. § 301.6011-5, as it existed on February 23,
2023, shall file the return required under this section electronically.
(2) A taxpayer filing a return under this section that is a
member of an affiliated group in a federal consolidated return in which the
federal parent corporation would be required to file electronically with the
Internal Revenue Service under 26 C.F.R. § 301.6011-5, as it existed on
February 23, 2023, shall file the taxpayer's state return electronically
under this section whether or not the federal parent corporation is an
eligible member of the affiliated group included in the state consolidated
return.
(3) The secretary may waive the electronic filing requirement
under subdivision (h)(1) or subdivision (h)(2) of this section for a taxpayer
only if the secretary determines that filing the return electronically would
cause an undue hardship on the taxpayer.

SECTION 3. EFFECTIVE DATE. Sections 1 and 2 of this act are effective
for tax years beginning on or after January 1, 2025.













03/21/2025 4:34:11 PM JLL092